Louisiana, session 2026, HB939.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 6-B of Title 32 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 32:1291 through 1294 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 6-B. Louisiana New and Used Motor Vehicle Commission
§1291. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and cited as the "Louisiana New and Used
Motor Vehicles, Parts, and Accessories Act".
§1292. Creation of the commission
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Louisiana
Motor Vehicle Commission and the Louisiana Used Motor Vehicle Commission are
hereby merged in the powers, duties and functions. The commission created by the
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1147 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 939
provisions of this Act shall be called the Louisiana New and Used Motor Vehicle
Commission.
B. The commission shall operate and create rules pursuant to the Louisiana
Motor Vehicle Commission and Louisiana Used Motor Vehicle Merger Study Task
Force regarding some or all of the recommendations on merging the commissions,
unified governance, licensing, enforcement, and technology.
§1293. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, "commission" means the Louisiana New
and Used Motor Vehicle Commission created by this Chapter or its designee.
§12794. Duties of the commission
A. The commission's powers and duties shall include but are not limited to
the following:
(1) Licensing and regulating independent used motor vehicle dealers and
salespersons, motor vehicle crushers, dealers of used motor vehicle parts and
accessories, rent-to-own dealers, scrap metal processors, wholesale motor vehicle
auctions, public or retail motor vehicle auctions, salvage pools that deal in used
motor vehicles, dismantlers and parts recyclers, catalytic converter dealers pursuant
to Part II-B of Chapter 21 of Title 37, manufacturers, distributors, recreational
product dealers, motor vehicle dealers and salespersons, factory branches, distributor
branches, satellite warranty and repair centers, brokers, motor vehicle lessors,
speciality vehicle dealers, and other occupations related to motor vehicle as
determined by the commission.
(2) Inspecting license applicants and licensee locations to ensure that they
are in an approved location, meet local zoning or other municipal requirements, and
have sufficient facilities which shall include but not be limited to a business sign, a
listed and usable telephone number, and a sales office.
(3) Requiring all licensees to maintain their records for a period of three
years and to keep their records, vehicles, and places of business open to inspection
by any peace officer or agent of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections or
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1147 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 939
of the commission during reasonable hours. The records shall include bills of sale,
financing or mortgage records, and monthly sales reports.
(4) Holding and conducting hearings on appeals of license, denials,
violations, revoking or suspending licenses, imposing civil penalties, assessing
restitution, issuing cease and desist orders, and seeking injunctions pursuant to this
Chapter.
(5)(a) Taking possession of certificates of title and further distributing those
titles to the rightful owners pursuant to R.S. 32:705 from:
(i) An independent used motor vehicle dealer who failed or refused to
provide a certificate of title to his customer or to the rightful owners in accordance
with R.S. 32:705.
(ii) An independent used motor vehicle dealer who has ceased doing
business and who has failed to provide a certificate of title to his customer or to the
rightful owners in accordance with R.S. 32:705.
(iii) A floor plan financier or other similar holder of a security interest
relative to a used motor vehicle who has failed or refused to provide a certificate of
title to a bona fide retail purchaser in actual good faith in accordance with R.S.
32:710(D).
(b)(i) Empowering the executive director of the commission to take any and
all actions necessary to obtain and deliver a certificate of title to a retail purchaser
in actual good faith including instituting or participating in any legal action to obtain
a certificate of title and endorsing a certificate of title on behalf of any independent
used motor vehicle dealer who either refuses or is unavailable to sign or endorse the
certificate of title.
(ii) Providing that if the commission institutes or participates in legal action
to obtain a certificate of title for delivery to a retail purchaser in actual good faith,
the commission is entitled to an award of reasonable attorney fees and court costs to
be paid by the individual or entity responsible for delivery of the certificate of title.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1147 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 939
(6) Issuing, serving, and enforcing a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum
pursuant to any hearing or lawful investigation into the suspected misconduct of any
licensee or persons suspected of violation of this Chapter.
(7)(a) Having the sole and exclusive authority to administer all claims made
against the bonds including the denial or rejection of any claim.
(b) Authorizing the executive director of the commission to take any action
necessary to administer claims against any bond, including instituting or intervening
in a legal action to obtain payment of a claim or to prevent payment of an
unauthorized claim. If the commission institutes or intervenes in any legal action as
authorized by this Subparagraph and prevails, the court shall award the commission
reasonable attorney fees and court costs to be paid by the licensee, surety, or both.
(8) Having the authority to create and implement fees to administer the
provisions of the Chapter.
(9) Creating a task force to oversee revenue reserved for ongoing technology
maintenance, future system enhancements, and educational training programs.
(10) Adopting rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this
Chapter.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to make technical
changes to statutory laws as necessary to reflect the merger of the Louisiana Used Motor
Vehicle Commission and the Louisiana Motor Vehicle Commission as provided in this Act.
Section 3.(A) The Louisiana Used Motor Vehicle Commission and the Louisiana
Motor Vehicle Commission shall take all necessary actions prior to the effective date,
including but not limited to amending, adopting, and repealing administrative rules, as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Act.
(B) Unfinished business. Upon the transfer of duties and functions as provided in
this Section, any pending or unfinished business of the Louisiana Used Motor Vehicle
Commission and the Louisiana Motor Vehicle Commission shall be taken over and
completed by the Louisiana New and Used Motor Vehicle Commission. The Louisiana New
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1147 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 939
and Used Motor Vehicle Commission shall be the successor in every way to the Louisiana
Used Motor Vehicle Commission and the Louisiana Motor Vehicle Commission.